en: Chicken stewing leg frozen
fr: Poule cuisse surgelée

en: Chicken breast without skin raw
fr: Poulet filet sans peau cru

en: Frozen chicken breast without skin raw
fr: Poulet filet sans peau cru surgelé

en: Chicken high leg meat raw
fr: Poulet haut de cuisse viande cru

en: Chicken eviscerated without offal raw
fr: Poulet éviscéré sans abats cru

en: Chicken wing meat and skin raw
fr: Poulet aile viande et peau cru

en: Chicken leg meat raw
fr: Poulet cuisse viande cru

en: Chicken breast meat and skin raw
fr: Poulet poitrine viande et peau cru

en: Variety packs
cs: Potraviny smíšená balení
de: Lebensmittel Mischpackungen
el: Τρόφιμα mικτή συσκευασία
es: Paquetes variados de alimentos
fi: Ruoka lajitelmapakkaukset
fr: Assortiments d'aliments
hr: Hrana zbirna pakiranja
hu: Több fajta élelmiszer összecsomagolása
it: Alimentari confezioni miste
ja: 食品のバラエティパック
ko: 식품 세트
lv: Pārtikas komplekti
nb: Mat flerpakk
nl: Levensmiddelen assortimenten
pl: Opakowania mix żywność
pt: Packs Variados de Alimentos
ru: Наборы из продуктов пищевых
sk: Potraviny zmiešané balenie
sr: Hrana pakovanja različitih proizvoda iz ove grupe
sv: Livsmedel blandförpackningar
tr: Gıda paket çeşitliliği
zh: 多样化组合包

en: Prepared foods variety packs
de: Bearbeitete Nahrungsmittel Mischpackungen
es: Paquetes variados de alimentos en preparados
fr: Assortiments d'aliments préparés
hr: Različita pakiranja pripremljene hrane
it: Confezioni miste d'alimenti pronti
nl: Bewerkte levensmiddelassortimenten
pt: Packs variados de alimentos preparados
tr: Hazır gıda çeşitlilik paketi

en: Whole durum wheat spirals
fr: Spirales de blé dur complet
zh: 全杜兰小麦螺旋意面

en: Semi whole durum wheat spirals
fr: Spirales de blé dur semi-complet
zh: 半杜兰小麦螺旋意面